cs: Účinek péče o pleť: Proti akné; Proti stárnutí pleti; Antibakteriální; Proti černým tečkám; Proti skvrnám; Proti celulitidě; Proti tmavým kruhům; Proti tmavým kruhům; Proti vysušování; Proti otupělosti; Proti únavě; Proti nedokonalostem; Proti podráždění; Proti svědění; Proti keratinu; Proti částicím; Proti popraskaným koutkům; Proti pupínkům; Proti otokům; Proti zarudnutí; Proti oděru; Proti jizvám; Proti lesku; Proti stresu; Proti striím; Proti vráskám; Rozjasňující; Bronzující; Zklidňující; Rozjasnění; Čištění; Korekce barev; Chladivý; Vysušující; Elasticita; Energizující; Exfoliační; Vyplňující účinek; Zpevnění; Hojivý; Hydratační; Rozjasňující; Osvěžující; Redukce keratinu; Vyrovnávací; Liftingový; zmatňující; Zvlhčující; Vyživující; Okysličující; Zvětšující; Zjemnění pórů; Zmenšování pórů; Stahování pórů; Prevence stařeckých skvrn; Zabraňuje vzniku pih; Podkladová péče; Ochrana; Čištění; Vyrovnávání pleti; Osvěžení; Regenerační; Relaxační; Regenerační; Vyplňující; Revitalizační; Oživující; Peeling; Třpytivý; Lesk; Zeštíhlující; Uklidňující; Změkčující; Uklidňující; Posilující; Vypnutí; Tonizující; Ošetření; Odstranění ucpání; Nerovnoměrný odstín pleti; Zahřívání; Bělicí; Jiné
lt-LT: Odos priežiūros priemonių poveikis: Nuo aknės; Nuo senėjimo požymių; Antibakterinė; Nuo inkštirų; Nuo pigmentinių dėmių; Nuo celiulito; Nuo tamsių paakių; Nuo tamsių dėmelių; Nuo odos sausėjimo; Nuo odos papilkėjimo; Nuo nuovargio; Nuo odos netolygumų; Nuo sudirgimo; Nuo niežulio; Nuo keratino; Nuo antidalelių; Nuo infekcijų; Nuo spuogų; Nuo paburkimo; Nuo paraudimo; Nuo nutrynimo; Nuo randų; Nuo blizgėjimo; Nuo streso; Nuo strijų; Nuo raukšlių; Šviesinamasis; Bronzinamasis; Raminamasis; Skaistinamasis; Valomasis; Spalvų korekcija; Vėsinamasis; Sausinamasis; Suteikiantis elastingumo; Energizuojantis; Eksfolijuojamasis; Užpildo efektas; Stangrinamasis; Gydomasis; Drėgmės pusiausvyrą atkuriantis; Švytėjimo suteikiantis; Gaivinamasis; Keratino mažinimas; Glotninamasis; Stangrinamasis; Matinį efektą suteikiantis; Drėkinamasis; Maitinamasis; Deguonimi prisotinantis; Apimtį didinantis; Poras valantis; Poras sutraukiantis; Poras mažinantis; Apsaugo nuo pigmentinių dėmių atsiradimo; Apsaugo nuo strazdanų atsiradimo; Makiažo bazė; Apsauginis; Giliai valantis; Odos pusiausvyrą atkuriantis; Suteikiantis gaivumo; Regeneruojantis; Atpalaiduojantis; Atkuriamasis; Intensyviai drėkinantis; Atgaivinamasis; Gaivinamasis; Šveičiamasis; Žvilgesio suteikiantis; Blizgesio suteikiantis; Liekninamasis; Glotninamasis; Minkštinamasis; Raminamasis; Stiprinamasis; Stangrinantis; Tonizuojantis; Procedūra; Poras atkemšantis; Netolygus odos atspalvis; Šildantis; Balinamasis; Kita
ro-RO: Efect de îngrijire a pielii: Anti-acnee; Anti-îmbătrânire; Anti-bacterian; Combate punctele negre; Anti-pete; Anti-celulită; Anti-cearcăn; Combate petele pigmentare; Anti-uscare; Combate tenul tern; Anti-oboseală; Anti-imperfectiuni; Anti-iritații; Anti-mâncărime; Combate acumularea de cheratină; Protejează împotriva particulelor poluante; Anti-cheilită; Anti-coșuri; Combate pungile de sub ochi; Anti-roșeață; Anti-frecare; Anti-cicatrici; Anti-strălucire; Antistres; Anti-vergeturi; Antirid; Iluminare; Bronzare; Calmare; Claritate; Curățare; Corecția culorii; Răcoritor; Uscare; Elasticitate; Energizant; Exfoliant; Efect de umplere; Fermitate; Vindecare; Hidratant; Iluminator; Revigorant; Reduce producția de cheratină; Uniformizare; Lifting; Matifiant; Hidratant; Nutritiv; Oxigenare; Umplere; Rafinarea porilor; Micșorarea porilor; Strângerea porilor; Previne petele pigmentare; Previne pistruii; Pregătirea tenului; Protecție; Purificare; Reechilibrare; Împrospătare; Regenerator; Relaxant; Reparare; Reumplere; Revitalizant; Revigorant; Scrub; Sclipitor; Strălucire; Slăbire; Netezire; Catifelare; Calmare; Întărire; Fermitate; Tonifiant; Tratament; Desfundarea; Nuanță neuniformă a tenului; Încălzire; Albire; Altele
da: Hudplejeeffekt: Anti-akne; Anti-aging; Anti-bakteriel; Anti-hudorme; Anti-pletter; Anti-cellulit; Anti-mørke rande; Anti-mørke pletter; Anti-tørrende; Anti-sløvhed; Anti-træthed; Anti-imperfektioner; Anti-irritation; Anti-kløe; Anti-keratin; Anti-partikler; Anti-perleche; Anti-bumser; Anti-hævelser; Anti-rødme; Anti-gnidning; Anti-ar; Anti-glans; Anti-stress; Anti-strækmærker; Anti-rynker; Lysnende; Bronzefarvende; Beroligende; Klarhed; Rensende; Farvekorrektion; Kølende; Tørrende; Elasticitet; Energigivende; Eksfolierende; Fyldende effekt; Opstrammende; Helende; Hydrerende; Oplysende; Opkvikkende; Keratinreduktion; Udjævnende; Løftende; Mattificerende; Fugtgivende; Nærende; Iltgivende; Fyldende; Poreraffinerende; Porekrympende; Poreopstramning; Forebygger alderspletter; Forhindrer fregner; Primende; Beskyttelse; Rensende; Genbalancerende; Opfriskning; Regenererende; Afslapning; Reparerende; Genopfyldende; Revitaliserende; Genoplivende; Scrub; Glimrende; Glans; Slankende; Udglattende; Blødgørende; Beroligende; Styrkende; Opstrammende; Tonende; Behandling; Fjerner tilstopning; Ujævn hudfarve; Varmende; Blegende; Andet
bg-BG: Ефект на грижа за кожата: Против акне; Против стареене; Антибактериален; Защита от черни точки; Против петна; Антицелулитен; Против тъмни кръгове; Против тъмни петна; Защита от изсушаване; Срещу потъмняване; Защита от умора; Срещу несъвършенствата; Защита от дразнене; Защита от сърбеж; Антикератин; Античастици; Срещу перлехе; Срещу пъпки; Срещу подпухване; Срещу зачервяване; Против протриване; Защита от белези; Защита от лъщене; Антистрес; Против стрии; Против бръчки; Изсветляване; Бронзиране; Успокояващ; Яснота; Почистване; Корекция на цветовете; Охлаждане; Изсушаване; Еластичност; Енергизиращ; Ексфолиращ; Ефект на запълване; Укрепващ; Оздравяващ; Хидратиращ; Осветяващ; Ободряващ; Намаляване на кератина; Изравняване; Повдигане; Матиращ; Овлажняващ; Подхранващ; Окисляващ; Запълващ; Пречистване на порите; Свиване на порите; Стягане на порите; Предотвратява появата на старчески петна; Предотвратява появата на лунички; Грундиране; Защита; Пречистване; Възстановяване на баланса; Освежаващ; Регенериращ; Релаксация; Възстановяващ; Обогатяващ; Ревитализиращ; Съживяващ; Скраб; Блестящ; Блясък; Отслабване; Изглаждащ; Омекотяващ; Успокояващ; Укрепващ; Стягащ; Тонизиращ; Лечение; Отстраняване на запушвания; Неравномерен тен на кожата; Затоплящ; Избелващ; Други
vi: Hiệu quả chăm sóc da: Chống mụn trứng cá; Chống lão hóa; Chống vi khuẩn; Chống mụn đầu đen; Chống nhược điểm; Chống lại mỡ chảy; Chống quầng thâm; Chống nám; Chống khô; Chống xỉn màu; Chống mệt mỏi; Chống khuyết điểm; Chống kích ứng; Chống ngứa ngáy; Chống chất sừng; Chống vi hạt; Chống chốc mép; Chống mụn; Chống bọng mắt; Chống đỏ da; Chống cọ xát; Chống sẹo; Chống bóng dầu; Chống căng thẳng; Chống rạn da; Chống lão hóa; Làm sáng; Làm sạm; Làm dịu; Sáng da; Làm sạch; Chỉnh màu; Làm mát; Làm khô; Tăng độ đàn hồi; Tiếp năng lượng; Tẩy tế bào chết; Hiệu ứng làm đầy; Làm săn chắc; Chữa lành; Cấp ẩm; Sáng ra; Tràn đầy sức sống; Giảm sừng hóa; Làm phẳng da; Nâng cơ; Giảm bóng; Dưỡng ẩm; Nuôi dưỡng; Tăng cường oxy; Căng mọng; Se lỗ chân lông; Thu nhỏ lỗ chân lông; Làm săn chắc lỗ chân lông; Ngăn ngừa các đốm đồi mồi; Ngăn ngừa tàn nhang; Lớp lót trang điểm; Bảo vệ; Thanh lọc; Tái cân bằng; Làm mới; Tái tạo; Thư giãn; Phục hồi; Bổ sung; Kích thích; Hồi sức; Tẩy da chết; Lấp lánh; Làm sáng bóng; Giảm béo; Làm mượt; Làm mềm; Xoa dịu; Làm thẳng; Co lại; Làm săn; Trị liệu; Thông thoáng; Da không đều màu; Làm ấm; Kem đánh răng làm trắng; Khác
th: ผลการดูแลผิว: ป้องกันสิว; ลดเลือนริ้วรอย; ยับยั้งแบคทีเรีย; ป้องกันสิวหัวดำ; ป้องกันการเกิดฝ้า; ต่อต้านเซลลูไลท์; ป้องกันใต้ตาคล้ำ; ป้องกันจุดด่างดำ; ป้องกันอาการแห้ง; ต่อต้านความหมองคล้ำ; ป้องกันความเมื่อยล้า; ต่อต้านความไม่สมบูรณ์; ป้องกันการระคายเคือง; ป้องกันอาการคัน; ต่อต้านเคราติน; ต่อต้านอนุภาค; กำจัดผิวหนังอักเสบบริเวณริมฝีปาก; ป้องกันสิว; ป้องกันอาการบวม; ป้องกันรอยแดง; ป้องกันการถู; ลดเลือนรอยแผลเป็น; ต่อต้านความมันวาว; ต่อต้านความเครียด; ลดร่องรอยผิวแตกลาย; ลดเลือนริ้วรอย; ไบรท์เทนนิ่ง; บรอนเซอร์; ให้ความสงบ; เพื่อความกระจ่างใส่; คลีนซิ่ง; แก้ไขสี; ระบายความร้อน; สูตรแห้ง; ความยืดหยุ่น; ให้พลังงาน; ผลัดเซลล์ผิว; เอฟเฟกต์ฟิลเลอร์; ช่วยให้ดูกระชับ; การฟื้นสภาพ; ให้ความชุ่มชื้น; ส่องสว่าง; เติมพลัง; การลดเคราติน; การปรับระดับ; การยก; เพื่อผิวไม่มันวาว; เติมความชุ่มชื้น; บำรุง; การเติมออกซิเจน; เพิ่มความโดดเด้ง; ปรับรูขุมขนกว้างให้เล็กลง; ปรับรูขุมขนให้เล็กลง; กระชับรูขุมขน; ป้องกันร่องรอยบอกอายุ; ป้องกันฝ้ากระ; รองพื้น; ปกป้อง; การทำให้บริสุทธิ์; การปรับสมดุล; ให้ความสดชื่น; การฟื้นฟู; การผ่อนคลาย; การซ่อมแซม; การเติมเต็ม; ฟื้นบำรุง; การฟื้นคืนความมีชีวิตชีวา; สครับ; ระยิบระยับ; เปล่งประกาย; เพื่อการลดน้ำหนัก; ช่วยให้เรียบเนียน; ช่วยให้ดูอ่อนนุ่ม; ช่วยปลอบประโลม; ช่วยให้แข็งแรง; ช่วยกระชับ; ให้ความรู้สึกสบาย; การบำรุงรักษา; แก้รูขุมขนอุดตัน; สีผิวไม่สม่ำเสมอ; ให้ความรู้สึกที่อบอุ่น; ไวท์เทนนิ่ง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Efeito de cuidados com a pele: Antiacne; Anti-idade; Antibacteriano; Anticravo; Antidefeito; Anticelulite; Anticírculo escuro; Antimancha escura; Antissecagem; Antimonotonia; Antifadiga; Anti-imperfeições; Anti-irritação; Anticoceira; Antiqueratina; Antipartículas; Antiperleche; Antiespinhas; Anti-inchaço; Antivermelhidão; Antifricção; Anticicatrizes; Antibrilho; Antiestresse; Antiestrias; Antirrugas; Iluminação; Bronzeamento; Calmante; Claridade; Limpeza; Correção de cor; Refrescante; Controle de umidade; Elasticidade; Energizante; Esfoliação; Efeito de preenchimento; Firmeza; Cuidados; Hidratação; Iluminador; Revigorante; Redução de queratina; Nivelamento; Elevação; Matificante; Hidratante; Nutritivo; Oxigenação; Volume; Refinamento de poros; Redução dos poros; Fechamento dos poros; Previne manchas de idade; Previne sardas; Preparação; Proteção; Purificação; Reequilíbrio; Refrescante; Regeneração; Relaxamento; Reparador; Reabastecedor; Revitalizante; Revitalizador; Removedor; Cintilante; Brilho; Emagrecimento; Suavização; Amaciante; Suavizante; Fortificante; Revigorante; Tonificante; Tratamento; Desentupimento; Tom de pele irregular; Aquecimento; Branqueamento; Outro
tr: Cilt Bakım Etkisi: Akne karşıtı; Yaşlanma karşıtı; Antibakteriyel; Siyah nokta önleyici; Leke karşıtı; Selülit karşıtı; Siyah nokta karşıtı; Cilt lekesi karşıtı; Kuruma karşıtı; Solukluk karşıtı; Yorgunluk karşıtı; Kusur önleyici; Enfeksiyon karşıtı; Kaşıntı karşıtı; Keratin karşıtı; Parçacık karşıtı; Perleş karşıtı; Sivilce karşıtı; Şişkinlik karşıtı; Kızarıklık karşıtı; Tahriş karşıtı; Yara izi karşıtı; Parlama karşıtı; Stres karşıtı; Çatlak karşıtı; Kırışıklık karşıtı; Parlatıcı; Bronzlaştırıcı; Sakinleştirici; Berraklaştırıcı; Temizleyici; Renk eşitleyici; Soğutucu; Kurutucu; Esneklik; Enerji verici; Peeling etkisi; Dolgu etkisi; Sıkılaştırıcı; İyileştirici; Sulandırıcı; Aydınlatıcı; Canlandırıcı; Keratin azaltıcı; Eşitleme; Kaldırma; Matlaştırıcı; Nemlendirici; Besleyici; Oksijen verici; Dolgunlaştırıcı; Gözenek temizleyici; Gözenek daraltıcı; Gözenek sıkılaştırıcı; Yaşlılık lekelerini önler; Çilleri önler; Astar etkisi; Koruma; Arındırıcı; Dengeleyici; Ferahlatıcı; Yenileyici; Rahatlatıcı; Onarıcı; Tazeleyici; Canlandırıcı; Diriltici; Fırçalama; Parıldama; Parıltı; İnceltici; Pürüzsüzleştirici; Yumuşatıcı; Gevşetici; Güçlendirici; Sıkılaştırıcı; Tonlayıcı; Tedavi; Gözenek açma; Düzensiz Cilt Tonu; Isıtma; Beyazlatıcı; Diğer
es: Efecto del cuidado de la piel: Contra el acné; Contra el envejecimiento; Antibacteriano; Contra los puntos negros; Contra las manchas; Anticelulítico; Contra las ojeras; Antimanchas; Contra la piel seca; Contra la falta de brillo; Contra la fatiga; Contra las imperfecciones; Contra la irritación; Contra la picazón; Antiqueratina; Antipartículas; Antiperleche; Contra las espinillas; Contra la hinchazón; Contra el enrojecimiento; Antiroce; Contra las cicatrices; Contra el brillo; Contra el estrés; Antiestrías; Antiarrugas; Iluminador; Bronceador; Calmante; Claridad; Limpiador; Corrección del color; Refrescante; Secador; Elasticidad; Energizante; Exfoliante; Efecto de relleno; Reafirmante; Curativo; Hidratante; Iluminador; Vigorizante; Reducción de queratina; Nivelación; Lifting; Matificante; Hidratante; Nutritivo; Oxigenante; Aumentador de volumen; Refinación de poro; Reducción de poros; Tensa los poros; Previene las manchas de la edad; Previene las pecas; Imprimación; Protección; Purificante; Reequilibrante; Refrescante; Regenerador; Relajación; Reparador; Reponer; Revitalizante; Revitalizar; Exfoliante; Reluciente; Brillo; Adelgazante; Suavizante; Suavizante; Calmante; Fortalecimiento; Reafirmante; Tonificante; Tratamiento; Desobstrucción; Tono de piel irregular; Calentamiento; Blanqueamiento; Otros
ja: スキンケア効果: ニキビ対策; アンチエイジング; 抗菌; 黒ずみ対策; シミ対策; 抗セルライト; 目の下のクマ対策; シミ対策; 乾燥対策; くすみ防止; 抗疲労; 不完全性対策; 炎症対策; かゆみ止め; 抗ケラチン; ぶつぶつ対策; 口角炎対策; ニキビ対策; むくみ対策; 赤み対策; かすり傷対策; 傷跡対策; テカリ対策; 抗ストレス; ストレッチマーク防止; しわ対策; ブライトニング; ブロンズ; 鎮静; クラリティ; クレンジング; 色補正; クーリング; 乾燥; 弾力; エナジャイジング; 角質除去; フィラー効果; 引き締め; ヒーリング; ハイドレイティング; イルミネーティング; 活性化; ケラチンの減少; レベリング; リフティング; マット化; モイスチャライジング; ナリシング; 酸素を与える; プランピング; 毛穴の改善; 毛穴を小さくする; 毛穴引き締め; シミを防ぐ; そばかすを防ぐ; 下地; 保護; 浄化; バランスを整える; リフレッシュ; 再生; リラクゼーション; 修復; 補給; 活性化; 生き返る; スクラブ; シマーリング; 輝く; スリミング; なめらかにする; 柔らかくする; 鎮静; 強化; 引き締め; 正常化; トリートメント; 詰まりを解消する; 肌の色ムラ; 温める; ホワイトニング; その他
fr: Effet soin de la peau: Anti-acné; Anti-âge; Antibactérien; Anti-points noirs; Anti-tache; Anti-cellulite; Anti-cernes; Anti-taches brunes; Anti-dessèchement; Anti-teint terne; Anti-fatigue; Anti-imperfections; Anti-irritation; Anti-démangeaisons; Anti-kératine; Anti-particules; Anti-perlèche; Anti-bouton; Anti-poches; Avec rougeurs; Anti-frottement; Anti-cicatrices; Anti-brillance; Anti stress; Anti-vergetures; Anti-rides; Éclaircissant; Bronzant; Calmant; Clarté; Nettoyant; Correction de couleur; Rafraîchissant; Séchant; Élasticité; Énergétique; Exfoliant; Effet de liftant; Raffermissant; Guérisseur; Hydratant; Illuminant; Revigorant; Réduction de la kératine; Dermaplaning; Lifting; Matifiant; Hydratant; Nourrissant; Oxygénant; Repulpant; Affinage des pores; Rétrécissement des pores; Resserrement des pores; Prévient les taches de vieillesse; Réduit les taches de rousseur; Prépare; Protège; Purifiant; Rééquilibrant; Rafraîchissant; Régénérant; Relaxation; Réparateur; Reconstituant; Revitalisant; Fait revivre; Exfoliant; Etincelant; Brillant; Amincissant; Lissant; Adoucissant; Apaisant; Renforce; Renforçant; Tonifiant; Traitement; Désobstrue; Teint inégal; Chauffant; Blanchissant; Autre
sk-SK: Efekt starostlivosti o pleť: Proti akné; Proti starnutiu; Anti-bakteriálne; Proti čiernym bodkám; Proti škvrnám; Proti celulitíde; Proti tmavým kruhom; Proti tmavým škvrnám; Proti vysychaniu; Proti otupenosti; Proti únave; Proti nedokonalostiam; Proti podráždeniu; Proti svrbeniu; Anti-keratín; Antičastice; Proti kútikom; Proti pupienkom; Proti opuchom; Proti začervenaniu; Proti odieraniu; Proti jazvám; Proti lesku; Antistresový; Proti strii; Proti vráskam; Rozjasňujúci; Bronzovanie; Upokojujúci; Jasnosť; Čistiaci; Korekcia farieb; Chladenie; Sušenie; Elasticita; Energizujúci; Exfoliačný; Výplňový efekt; Spevňujúci; Liečivý; Hydratujúci; Osvetľujúci; Povzbudzujúci; Redukcia keratínu; Nivelácia; Lifting; Zmatňujúci; Zvlhčujúci; Výživný; Okysličujúci; Rastúci; Zjemnenie pórov; Zmenšenie pórov; Sťahovanie pórov; Zabraňuje vzniku stareckých škvŕn; Zabraňuje vzniku pieh; Vytvorenie podkladu; Ochrana; Prečisťujúci; Vyvažujúci; Osviežujúci; Regenerujúci; Relaxácia; Opravný; Obnovujúci; Revitalizujúci; Oživenie; Peeling; Trblietavý; Lesk; Chudnutie; Vyhladenie; Zmäkčovanie; Upokojujúci; Posilňovanie; Uťahovanie; Tonizujúci; Liečba; Uvoľnenie upchatia; Nerovnomerný tón pleti; Otepľovanie; Bielenie; Iné
el: Αποτέλεσμα περιποίησης του δέρματος: Κατά της ακμής; Αντιγήρανση; Αντιβακτηριδιακό; Κατά του μαύρου στίγματος; Αντικηλιδωτό; Κατά της κυτταρίτιδας; Κατά του μαύρου κύκλου; Αντισκοτεινό σημείο; Αντιξήρανση; Κατά της θαμπάδας; Αντιολισθητικά χαλάκια; Κατά των ατελειών; Κατά του ερεθισμού; Κατά του κνησμού; Αντικερατίνη; Αντισωματίδια; Anti-perleche; Κατά του σπυριού; Κατά του πρηξίματος; Κατά της ερυθρότητας; Αντιτριβικό; Κατά των ουλών; Αντι-γυαλάδα; Αντι-στρες; Κατά των ραγάδων; Αντιρυτιδική; Λάμψη; Μαύρισμα; Ηρεμιστικό; Σαφήνεια; Καθαρισμός; Διόρθωση χρώματος; Ψύξη; Ξήρανση; Ελαστικότητα; Δυναμικό; Απολέπιση; Εφέ πλήρωσης; Σύσφιξη; Επούλωση; Ενυδατικό; Φωτιστικός; Τονωτικό; Μείωση κερατίνης; ισοπέδωση; Αρση; Ματτικοποιώντας; Για ενυδάτωση; Για θρέψη; Οξυγονωτική; Γέμισμα; Διύλιση πόρων; Συρρίκνωση των πόρων; Σύσφιξη πόρων; Προλαμβάνει τις κηλίδες ηλικίας; Προλαμβάνει τις πανάδες; Προετοιμασία; Για προστασία; Για καθαρισμό; Επανεξισορρόπηση; Φρεσκάρισμα; Για αναδόμηση; Χαλάρωση; Αποκατάσταση; Αναπλήρωση; Για αναζωογόνηση; Αναβίωση; Τριψίματος πατώματος; Λάμψη; Για λάμψη; Αδυνάτισμα; Για λείανση; Για απαλότητα; Καταπράυνση; Για ενδυνάμωση; Σφίξιμο; Τονωτικό; Θεραπεία; Αποφράξεις; Ανομοιόμορφος τόνος δέρματος; Θέρμανση; Λεύκανση; Άλλο
sv: Hudvårdseffekt: Anti-acne; Anti-aging; Antibakteriell; Anti-pormaskar; Anti-blemmor; Anti-celluliter; Anti-mörk cirkel; Anti-mörk fläck; Anti-uttorkning; Anti-matthet; Anti-trötthet; Anti-imperfektioner; Anti-irritation; Antiklåda; Anti-keratin; Anti-partiklar; Anti-perleche; Anti-finnar; Anti-svullnad; Anti-rodnad; Anti-gnidning; Anti-ärr; Anti-glans; Antistress; Anti-bristning; Anti-rynkor; Ljusning; Bronsning; Lugnande; Klarhet; Rengöring; Färgkorrigering; Kylning; Torkning; Elasticitet; Energigivande; Exfolierande; Fyllnadseffekt; Uppstramande; Läkande; Återfuktande; Upplysande; Uppfriskande; Keratinreduktion; Utjämning; Lyftning; Mattifierande; Återfuktande; Närande; Oxigenerande; Plumpning; Porförfinande; Porkrympning; Poruppstramning; Förhindrar åldersfläckar; Förhindrar fräknar; Grundning; Skydd; Renande; Återbalansering; Uppfriskande; Återskapande; Avslappnande; Reparerande; Påfyllning; Revitalisering; Återupplivande; Skrubbande; Skimrande; Glans; Bantning; Mjukgörande; Uppmjukande; Lugnande; Förstärkning; Uppstramande; Tonifierande; Behandling; Rengöring; Ojämn hudton; Värmande; Blekning; Annat
zh-TW: 皮膚護理效果: 抗痘; 抗老; 抗菌; 去黑頭; 去瑕; 抗橘皮; 去黑眼圈; 去黑斑; 超保濕; 抗暗沉; 抗疲勞; 去瑕疵; 無刺激; 止癢; 抗角蛋白; 反粒子; 去口角炎; 抗痘; 抗浮腫; 舒緩; 防摩擦; 去疤; 防眩光; 抗壓力; 抗妊娠紋; 抗皺; 亮白; 古銅; 鎮靜; 淨透; 潔淨; 顏色校正; 冰鎮; 控油; 彈性; 賦活; 去角質; 豐盈; 緊緻; 療癒; 保濕; 煥發光彩; 活力; 防止皮膚蠟黃; 調整; 提拉; 去油光; 保濕; 滋養; 活氧; 豐滿; 毛孔細緻; 收縮毛孔; 緊緻毛孔; 預防老人斑; 預防雀斑; 妝前; 防護; 淨化; 再平衡; 清爽; 再生; 舒緩; 修復; 補水; 煥發活力; 護膚再生; 去角質; 亮白; 閃耀; 瘦身; 嫩滑; 柔軟; 舒緩; 強化; 緊緻; 保濕爽膚; 修護; 清除堵塞; 修色護膚; 溫熱感; 美白; 其他
it: Trattamento per la pelle: Antiacne; Antietà; Antibatterico; Anti punti neri; Antimacchie; Anticellulite; Anti occhiaie; Anti macchie scure; Anti secco; Anti opacità; Antifatica; Anti imperfezioni; Anti irritazione; Antiprurito; Anticheratina; Antiparticelle; Anti perleche; Antibrufoli; Anti gonfiore; Anti rossore; Anti sfregamento; Anti cicatrici; Anti lucidità; Antistress; Anti smagliature; Antirughe; Schiarente; Abbronzante; Calmante; Schiarente; Detergente; Correzione del colore; Raffreddante; Pro asciugatura; Elasticità; Energizzante; Esfoliante; Effetto filler; Rassodante; Curativo; Idratante; Illuminante; Rinvigorente; Riduzione della cheratina; Livellante; Liftante; Opacizzante; Emolliente; Nutriente; Ossigenante; Rimpolpante; Ridefinizione dei pori; Riduzione dei pori; Restringimento dei pori; Prevenzione delle macchie dell’età; Prevenzione delle lentiggini; Primer; Protezione; Purificante; Riequilibrante; Rinfrescante; Rigenerante; Rilassamento; Riparatore; Ricostituente; Rivitalizzante; Ravvivante; Scrub; Lucentezza; Luminosità; Snellente; Levigante; Vellutante; Lenitivo; Rinforzante; Astringente; Tonificante; Trattamento; Pulizia; Colore della pelle non uniforme; Riscaldante; Sbiancante; Altro
hr-HR: Učinak proizvoda za njegu kože: Protiv akni; Protiv starenja; Antibakterijski; Protiv mitesera; Protiv mrlja; Anticelulitni; Protiv podočnjaka; Protiv tamnih mrlja; Protiv isušivanja; Protiv slabosti; Protiv umora; Protiv nesavršenosti; Protiv iritacije; Protiv svrbeža; Antikeratin; Protiv čestica; Protiv infekcije perleche; Protiv prištića; Protiv natečenosti; Protiv crvenila; Protiv trljanja; Protiv ožiljaka; Protiv sjaja; Antistres; Protiv strija; Protiv bora; Posvjetljivanje; Bronziranje; Smirivanje; Jasnoća; Čišćenje; Korekcija boja; Hlađenje; Sušenje; Elastičnost; Energiziranje; Eksfolijacija; Učinak punila; Učvršćivanje; Zacjeljivanje; Hidracija; Osvjetljavanje; Osnaživanje; Redukcija keratina; Niveliranje; Podizanje; Matiranje; Vlaženje; Hranjenje; Oksigenacija; Povećanje; Pročišćavanje pora; Smanjivanje pora; Sužavanje pora; Sprječava pojavu staračkih pjega; Sprječava pojavu pjega; Priprema; Zaštita; Čišćenje; Rebalansiranje; Osvježavanje; Regeneracija; Opuštanje; Obnavljanje; Nadopunjavanje; Revitaliziranje; Oživljavanje; Piling; Svjetlucavo; Sjaj; Mršavljenje; Zaglađivanje; Omekšavanje; Umirivanje; Jačanje; Zatezanje; Toniranje; Tretman; Odčepljivanje; Neujednačen ton kože; Zagrijavanje; Izbjeljivanje; Ostalo
pt-PT: Efeito para cuidado da pele: Antiacne; Antienvelhecimento; Antibacteriano; Antipontos negros; Antiborbulhas; Anticelulite; Antiolheiras; Antimanchas; Antissecagem; Antiapagamento; Antifadiga; Anti-imperfeições; Anti-irritação; Antiprurido; Antiqueratina; Antipartículas; Antiperleche; Antiespinhas; Anti-inchaço; Antivermelhidão; Antifricção; Anticicatrizes; Antibrilho; Antisstress; Antiestrias; Antirrugas; Iluminar; Bronzear; Calmante; Clareza; Limpeza; Correção de cores; Arrefecimento; Secante; Elasticidade; Energizante; Esfoliante; Efeito de preenchimento; Firmeza; Recuperação; Hidratante; Iluminada; Revigorante; Redução de queratina; Nivelamento; Elevação; Matificante; Umectante; Nutritivo; Oxigenado; Preenchimento; Refinamento de poros; Redução de poros; Atenuação de poros; Prevenção de manchas de envelhecimento; Prevenção de sardas; Primário; Proteção; Purificador; Reequilíbrio; Refrescante; Regenerador; Relaxamento; Reparador; Reabastecimento; Revitalizante; Revitalização; Esfoliação; Cintilante; Brilho; Emagrecimento; Suavização; Amaciante; Suavizante; Reforço; Atenuação; Tonificação; Tratamento; Desobstrução; Tom de pele irregular; Aquecimento; Branqueadora; Outro
nb: Hudpleieeffekt: Antiakne; Antialdringsmasker; Antibakteriell; Antihudorm; Antiflekk; Anticellulitt; Mot mørke sirkler; Mot mørke flekker; Antitørking; Antimatthet; Antiutmattelse; Antiimperfeksjoner; Antiirritasjon; Antikløe; Antikeratin; Antipartikler; Antiperleche; Antikvise; Antihevelse; Antirødhet; Antignidning; Antiarr; Antiglans; Antistress; Antistrekkmerke; Antirynke; Lysere; Bronsering; Beroligende; Klarhet; Rensende; Fargekorrigering; Avkjøling; Tørkende; Elastisitet; Energigivende; Eksfolierende; Fylleffekt; Oppstrammende; Helbredende; Hydrerende; Opplysende; Oppkvikkende; Keratinreduksjon; Utjevning; Løfting; Matterende; Fuktighetsgivende; Næringsgivende; Oksygengivende; Utfyllende; Poreraffinering; Porereduksjon; Porestramming; Forebygger aldersflekker; Forebygger fregner; Grunning; Beskyttelse; Rensende; Rebalansering; Forfriskende; Regenererende; Avslappende; Reparerende; Etterfyllende; Revitaliserende; Gjenopplivende; Skrubb; Skimrende; Skinnende; Slankende; Utjevnende; Mykgjørende; Beroligende; Styrkende; Oppstrammende; Tonifiserende; Behandling; Rengjøring; Ujevn hudtone; Oppvarming; Blekende; Annen
pl: Efekt pielęgnacji skóry: Przeciwtrądzikowa; Przeciwdziałanie starzeniu; Antybakteryjne; Antywągrowy; Zapobiegający skazom; Antycellulitowy; Zapobiega podkrążonym oczom; Chroni przed ciemną plamką; Zapobiega wysychaniu; Zapobiega matowieniu; Przeciwzmęczeniowy; Usuwa niedoskonałości; Zapobiega podrażnieniom; Zapobiega swędzeniu; Antykeratynowy; Zapobiega powstawaniu cząstek; Zapobiega perleniu; Ochrona przed pryszczami; Zapobiega opuchliźnie; Zapobiega zaczerwienieniom; Ochrona przed otarciami; Zapobiega bliznom; Zapobiega odblaskom; Antystresowy; Zapobiega rozstępom; Przeciwzmarszczkowy; Rozjaśniający; Brązowienie; Uspokojenie; Przejrzystość; Oczyszczanie; Korekta koloru; Chłodzenie; Suszenie; Elastyczność; Wzbudzanie; Złuszcza; Efekt wypełniacza; Ujędrniająca; Leczenie; Hydratacja; Rozświetlające; Orzeźwiający; Redukcja keratyny; Poziomowanie; Podnoszenie; Matujący; Nawilżający; Odżywiający; Natlenianie; Powiększanie; Rafinacja porów; Kurczenie się porów; Zamykanie porów; Zapobiega powstawaniu plam wiekowych; Zapobiega powstawaniu piegów; Podkład; Pozycja; Oczyszczenie; Równoważenie; Odświeżanie; Regeneracja; Relaksacja; Naprawa; Uzupełnienie; Odżywienie; Regeneracja; Peeling; Połyskujące; Blask; Wyszczuplenie; Wygładzanie; Zmiękczanie; Łagodzenie; Wzmocnienie; Zamykanie; Tonizacja; Leczenie; Odblokowywanie; Nierówny ton skóry; Nagrzewanie; Wybielanie; Pozostałe
ko: 스킨 케어 효과: 여드름 방지; 노화 방지; 항균; 블랙헤드 방지; 흠집 방지; 셀룰라이트 방지; 다크서클 방지; 다크 스팟 방지; 건조 방지; 지루함 방지; 피로 방지; 결함 방지; 자극 방지; 가려움증 방지; 각질 방지; 입자 방지; 구각창 방지; 여드름 방지; 붓기 방지; 홍조 방지; 마찰 방지; 흉터 방지; 광택 방지; 스트레스 방지; 임신선 방지; 주름 방지; 브라이트닝; 브론징; 진정; 투명도; 세정; 색상 보정; 쿨링; 건조; 탄력; 에너지 충전; 각질 제거; 필러 효과; 퍼밍; 회복; 수분 공급; 밝은; 활력 충전; 각질 감소; 레벨링; 리프팅; 매트화; 보습; 영양 공급; 산소 공급; 플럼핑; 모공 개선; 모공 수축; 모공 조임; 검버섯 예방; 주근깨 예방; 프라이밍; 보호; 정화; 리밸런싱; 리프레시; 재생; 휴식; 복구; 보충; 활력을 되찾음; 부활; 스크럽; 반짝임; 광택; 슬리밍; 매끄럽게; 부드럽게; 진정; 강화; 조임; 토니파잉; 트리트먼트; 막힘 해소; 고르지 못한 피부톤; 데우기; 미백; 기타
en: Skin care effect: Anti-acne; Anti-aging; Anti-bacterial; Anti-blackhead; Anti-blemish; Anti-cellulite; Anti-dark circle; Anti-dark spot; Anti-drying; Anti-dullness; Anti-fatigue; Anti-imperfections; Anti-irritation; Anti-itching; Anti-keratin; Anti-particles; Anti-perleche; Anti-pimple; Anti-puffiness; Anti-redness; Anti-rubbing; Anti-scars; Anti-shine; Anti-stress; Anti-stretch mark; Anti-wrinkle; Brightening; Bronzing; Calming; Clarity; Cleansing; Color correction; Cooling; Drying; Elasticity; Energizing; Exfoliating; Filler effect; Firming; Healing; Hydrating; Illuminating; Invigorating; Keratin reduction; Leveling; Lifting; Mattifying; Moisturizing; Nourishing; Oxygenating; Plumping; Pore refining; Pore shrinking; Pore tightening; Prevents age spots; Prevents freckles; Priming; Protection; Purifying; Rebalancing; Refreshing; Regenerating; Relaxation; Repairing; Replenishing; Revitalizing; Reviving; Scrub; Shimmering; Shine; Slimming; Smoothing; Softening; Soothing; Strengthening; Tightening; Tonifying; Treatment; Unclogging; Uneven skin tone; Warming; Whitening; Other
zh-CN: 护肤效果: 抗痘; 抗衰老; 抗菌; 去黑头; 淡斑; 抗橘皮; 抗黑眼圈; 抗黑斑; 防干燥; 去暗黄; 抗疲劳; 抗瑕疵; 抗刺激; 止痒; 抗角蛋白; 反粒子; 抗口角炎; 去痤疮; 抗浮肿; 抗红血丝; 防擦; 抗疤; 防眩光; 减压; 抗妊娠纹; 抗皱纹; 亮肤; 古铜; 舒缓; 明晰; 清洁去污; 色彩校正; 冷却; 干燥; 弹性; 焕活保养; 去角质; 丰满效果; 紧致; 修复; 保湿; 提亮; 焕发活力; 角蛋白减少; 均匀肤色; 提拉; 控油; 补水; 滋补; 氧化; 丰盈; 毛孔细致; 收缩毛孔; 毛孔紧致; 防止老年斑; 防止雀斑; 打底; 保护; 净化; 平衡调理; 清爽; 再生; 舒缓; 修护皮肤; 补水; 焕发活力; 修复; 去角质; 闪耀; 光泽; 瘦脸; 柔润; 柔软; 舒缓; 强化; 紧致; 滋补; 护理; 清理毛孔; 肤色不均; 温热; 美白; 其他
hu: Bőrápoló hatás: Akne ellen; Öregedés ellen; Antibakteriális; Mitesszer ellen; Folt ellen; Narancsbőr ellen; Sötét kör ellen; Sötét folt ellen; Száradás ellen; Tompaság ellen; Fáradtság ellen; Tökéletlenségek ellen; Irritáció ellen; Viszketés ellen; Keratin ellen; Részecskék ellen; Herpesz ellen; Pattanás ellen; Duzzanat ellen; Vörösség ellen; Dörzsölés ellen; Hegek ellen; Fény ellen; Stressz ellen; Striák ellen; Ránc ellen; Világosító; Bronzosító; Nyugtató; Világosító; Méregtelenítő; Színkorrekció; Hűtő; Szárító; Rugalmasító; Energetizáló; Hámlasztó; Kitöltő hatás; Feszesítő; Gyógyító; Hidratáló; Megvilágító; Élénkítő; Keratincsökkentő; Szintező; Emelő; Mattító; Hidratáló; Tápláló; Oxigénizáló; Vastagító; Pórusfinomító; Póruskisebbítő; Pórusösszehúzó; Megakadályozza az öregségi foltokat; Megakadályozza a szeplőket; Alapozó; Védelmező; Tisztító; Újraegyensúlyozó; Frissítő; Regeneráló; Relaxációs; Javító; Feltöltő; Revitalizáló; Újraélesztő; Súroló; Csillogó; Ragyogó; Karcsúsító; Simító; Lágyító; Nyugtató hatású; Erősítő; Összehúzó; Tonizáló; Kezelő; Duguláselhárító; Egyenetlen bőrtónus; Melegítő; Fehérítő; Egyéb
ru: Эффект средств для ухода за кожей: Против угревой сыпи; Против старения; Антибактериальный; Против черных точек; Против несовершенств; Антицеллюлитный; Против темных кругов; Против темных пятен; Против высыхания; Против тусклости; Против следов усталости; Против несовершенств; Против раздражения; Против зуда; Антикератин; Против загрязнений; Против заед; Против прыщей; Против отечности; Против покраснений; Против натирания; Против шрамов; Анти-блеск; Антистресс; Против растяжек; Против морщин; Осветление; Бронзирование; Успокаивающий; Чистота; Очищение; Цветокоррекция; Охлаждение; Посушивание; Эластичность; Энергизация; Отшелушивание; Эффект филлера; Укрепление; Заживление; Гидрофильный; Осветление; Бодрящий; Сокращение кератина; Выравнивание; Лифтинг; Матирующий; Увлажнение; Питание; Насыщение кислородом; Уплотнение; Очищение пор; Уменьшение пор; Сужение пор; Предотвращает появление пигментных пятен; Предотвращает появление веснушек; Праймер; Защита; Очищение; Восстановление баланса; Освежающий; Регенерация; Расслабление; Восстановление; Наполнение; Оживление; Реставрация; Скрабирование; Мерцание; Блеск; Похудение; Разглаживание; Смягчение; Успокаивающий; Укрепление; Подтяжка; Тонизирование; Лечение; Глубокое очищение; Неровный тон кожи; Согревающий; Отбеливание; Другое
fi: Ihonhoitovaikutus: Aknen vastainen; Ikääntymisen vaikutuksia estävä; Antibakteerinen; Mustapäiden vastainen; Laikkuja estävä; Anti-selluliitti; Tummia ympyröitä estävä; Tummia pisteitä estävä; Kuivumista estävä; Tylsyyden esto; Väsymystä estävä; Epätäydellisyyksiä vastaan; Ärsyttämätön; Kutisematon; Anti-keratiini; Hiukkasia vastaan; huulisierettymää vastaan; finnejä vastaan; Turvotusta ehkäisevä; Punoitusta estävä; Hankaamista estävä; Arpia peittävä; Kiiltoa estävä; Stressiä estävä; Venymisarpia estävä; Ryppyjä estävä; Kirkastava; Ruskettava; Rauhoittava; Selkeys; Puhdistava; Värinkorjaus; Viilennys; Kuivaus; Elastisuus; Energisoiva; Kuoriva; Täytevaikutus; Kiinteyttävä; Parantava; Kosteuttava; Valaiseva; Virkistävä; Keratiinin vähentäminen; Tasoittava; Kohottava; Mattaava; Kosteuttava; Ravitseva; Hapettava; Täyteläisyyttä lisäävä; Huokosten korjaus; Huokosten kutistuminen; Huokosten tiukennus; Ehkäisee ikäpisteitä; Ehkäisee pisamia; Pohjustava; Suojaus; Puhdistava; Tasapainottava; Virkistys; Regeneroiva; Rentouttava; Korjaava; Täydentävä; Elvyttävä; Elvyttävä; Hankaava; hohtava; Kiilto; Hoikentava; Silottava; Pehmentävä; Rauhoittava; Vahvistava; Tiukentava; Sävyttävä; Hoito; Tukosten poistaminen; Epätasaiselle iholle; Lämpeneminen; Valkaiseva; Muu
de: Hautpflegeeffekt: Anti-Akne; Anti-Aging; Antibakteriell; Anti-Mitesser; Anti-Flecken; Anti-Cellulite; Anti-Dunkelkreis; Anti-Dunkelfleck; Anti-Trocknen; Anti-Stumpfheit; Anti-Müdigkeit; Anti-Unvollkommenheiten; Anti-Reizung; Anti-Juckreiz; Anti-Keratin; Anti-Partikel; Anti-Faulecken; Anti-Pickel; Anti-Schwellungen; Anti-Rötung; Anti-Reibung; Anti-Narben; Anti-Glänzen; Anti-Stress; Anti-Dehnungsstreifen; Anti-Falten; Aufhellend; Bronzierend; Beruhigend; Klarheit; Reinigung; Farbkorrektur; Kühlung; Trocknen; Elastizität; Anregend; Peeling; Fülleffekt; Straffend; Heilend; Feuchtigkeitsspendend; Erhellend; Belebend; Keratinreduktion; Glättung; Heben; Mattierend; Befeuchtend; Nährend; Sauerstoffspendend; Aufpolsternd; Porenverfeinerung; Porenverkleinerung; Porenstraffung; Beugt Altersflecken vor; Verhindert Sommersprossen; Grundierung; Schutz; Reinigend; Neuausgleich; Erfrischend; Regenerierend; Entspannung; Reparatur; Auffrischend; Revitalisierend; Wiederbelebend; Peeling; Schimmernd; Glanz; Verschlankend; Glättend; Weichmachend; Beruhigend; Stärkend; Straffend; Tonisierend; Behandlung; Entstopfend; Ungleichmäßiger Hautton; Wärmend; Aufhellend; Sonstiges
nl: Huidverzorgingseffect: Anti-acne; Anti-veroudering; Antibacterieel; Anti-mee-eter; Anti-vlekken; Anti-cellulitis; Anti-donkere kring; Anti-donkere vlek; Anti-uitdroging; Tegen doffe huid; Anti-vermoeidheid; Anti-imperfecties; Anti-irritatie; Anti-jeuk; Anti-keratine; Anti-deeltjes; Anti-mondhoekkloven; Anti-puistjes; Anti-opzwelling; Tegen roodheid; Tegen schuren; Anti-littekens; Anti-glans; Anti-stress; Anti-striae; Anti-rimpel; Verhelderend; Bronzend; Kalmerend; Helderheid; Reiniging; Kleurcorrectie; Koeling; Drogen; Elasticiteit; Energiegevend; Exfoliërend; Vuleffect; Verstevigend; Genezing; Hydraterend; Verhelderend; Verkwikkend; Keratinevermindering; Nivellering; Liftend; Matterend; Vochtinbrengend; Voedend; Zuurstofinbrengend; Opvullend; Verfijnen van poriën; Krimpen van poriën; Verstrakking van de poriën; Voorkomt ouderdomsvlekken; Voorkomt sproeten; Vullend; Bescherming; Zuiverend; Opnieuw in evenwicht brengen; Verfrissend; Regenererend; Ontspanning; Repareren; Aanvullen; Revitaliserend; Nieuw leven inblazen; Scrub; Glinsterend; Glans; Afslanken; Gladmakend; Verzachtend; Kalmerende; Versterkend; Verstrakkend; Tonificerend; Behandeling; Ontstoppen; Ongelijkmatige huidtin; Verwarmend; Witmakend; Andere
sl-SI: Učinek nege kože: Proti aknam; Proti staranju; Protibakterijsko; Proti ogrcem; Proti madežem; Proti celulitu; Proti podočnjakom; Proti temnim madežem; Proti izsušitvi; Proti pustosti; Proti utrujenosti; Proti nepopolnostim; Proti draženju; Proti srbenju; Anti-keratin; Protidelci; Proti perleku; Proti mozoljem; Proti zabuhlosti; Proti rdečici; Proti drgnjenju; Proti brazgotinam; Proti sijaju; Proti stresu; Proti strijam; Proti gubam; Posvetlitev; Bronanje; Pomirjujoče; Jasnost; Čiščenje; Barvna korekcija; Hlajenje; Sušenje; Elastičnost; Energičnost; Piling; Učinek polnila; Učvrstitev; Zdravljenje; Hidracija; Osvetljujoče; Poživljajoče; Zmanjšanje keratina; Niveliranje; Dviganje; Matiranje; Vlaženje; Hranilno; Oksigenacija; Polnjenje; Rafiniranje por; Zmanjšanje por; Zoženje por; Preprečuje starostne pege; Preprečuje pege; Priprava; Zaščita; Očiščevanje; Ponovno uravnoteženje; Osvežujoče; Regeneracija; Sprostitev; Popravilo; Polnjenje; Revitalizacija; Oživljanje; Drgnenje; Svetleče; Sijaj; Hujšanje; Glajenje; Mehčanje; Pomirjanje; Krepitev; Zategovanje; Tonificiranje; Zdravljenje; Odmašitev; Neenakomerna polt kože; Ogrevanje; Beljenje; Drugo